Washington statutes.
RCW 10.34.030

Escape—Retaking in foreign state—Extradition agents.

The governor may appoint agents to make a demand upon the executive authority of any state or territory for the surrender of any fugitive from justice, or any other person charged with a felony or any other crime in this state. Whenever an application shall be made to the governor for the appointment of an agent he or she may require the official submitting the same to provide whatever information is necessary prior to approval of the application.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1035; 1993 c 442 s 1; 1967 c 91 s 2; 1891 c 28 s 98; Code 1881 s 971; 1873 p 217 s 157; 1854 p 102 s 5; RRS s 2241.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 442: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1993." [ 1993 c 442 s 2.]